Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 1
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL SERVICES

Sec.

§ 44-101. Department of labor and industrial services. [Repealed.]

§ 44-102. Director of department. [Repealed.]

§ 44-103. Duties of the director. [Repealed.]

§ 44-104. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-104A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-104B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-105. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-106. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-107. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-107A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-107B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-108. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-109. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 44-110 — 44-118. Examination of mines — Complaints to director — Neglect of mine owner — Inspectors — Accidents — Records — Reports — Safety inspections. [Repealed.]

§ 44-119. Federal aid. [Repealed.]

§ 44-120. Mine safety advisory board. [Repealed.]